Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
27-60-106. Jail-based behavioral health services program - purpose - created - funding - repeal.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the jail-based behavioral health services program, referred to in this section as the "program". The program may receive money from the correctional treatment cash fund pursuant to section 18-19-103 (5)(c)(V).

The purpose of the program is to:

Provide adequate staff to complete behavioral health screenings; prescribe psychiatric medications as necessary; and provide mental health counseling, substance use disorder treatment pursuant to section 18-19-103 (5)(c)(V), and transitional care coordination;

Train jail staff on behavioral health disorders and best practices in working with individuals with mental health, substance use, and co-occurring disorders; and

Fund administrative costs to jails that implement the requirements outlined in subsection (3) of this section.

The BHA shall prioritize jails with minimal behavioral health services, including but not limited to rural and frontier jails.

Subject to available appropriations, the BHA shall require a county jail that receives funding through the program to:

Screen all individuals booked into the jail facility with standardized evidence-based screening tools, as determined by the BHA, for mental health disorders, substance use disorders, and suicide risk;

Assess all individuals when booked into the jail facility and at any time subsequent to booking when clinically indicated for substance use withdrawal symptoms and develop protocols for medical detoxification monitoring procedures, medication-assisted treatment, or other appropriate withdrawal management care, consistent with the requirements pursuant to sections 17-26-104.9 and 17-26-140;

Assess all individuals booked into the jail facility for psychiatric medication needs by requesting and reviewing medical and prescription history;

Have access to all psychiatric medications, as defined by the medication formulary established pursuant to section 27-70-103;

Assist in the provision of coordinated services for individuals in jail custody who may require competency restoration services;

Coordinate services with community behavioral health providers prior to the release of an inmate to ensure continuity of care following his or her release from the jail facility;

Track performance outcomes for measures developed by the BHA, including behavioral health disorder prevalence and service data through information-sharing processes, as defined by the BHA; and

Partner with the BHA to develop feasible health information exchange strategies for medical and behavioral health records.

The BHA shall require a county jail that receives funding through the program to have a policy in place on or before January 1, 2020, that describes how medication-assisted treatment, as defined in section 23-21-803, will be provided, when necessary, to individuals confined in the county jail. The BHA shall require a county jail that receives funding through the program to develop, implement, and publish a policy on or before January 1, 2023, that describes the provision of medication-assisted treatment and other appropriate withdrawal management care upon release from jail.

A sheriff who is the custodian of a county jail or city and county jail may enter into agreements with community agencies, behavioral health organizations, and substance use disorder treatment organizations to assist in the development and administration of medication-assisted treatment in the jail.

Subject to available appropriations, nothing in this section prohibits program funds from being used to meet the requirements outlined in sections 17-26-303 and 17-26-304 for local jails, as defined in section 17-26-302 (2), by providing additional staffing, training, robust behavioral health services and supports, or facility changes. Any facility changes must be approved by the BHA before funds may be expended.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-250), ch. 403, p. 2377, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2019:

(5) added, (SB 19-008), ch. 275, p. 2599, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

(6) added, (HB 21-1211), ch. 322, p. 1982, § 3, effective June 24.

L. 2022:

(1), (3), IP(4), (4)(a), (4)(g), (4)(h), (5)(a), and (6) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1523, § 92, effective July 1; IP(4), (4)(b), and (5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1326), ch. 225, p. 1650, § 27, effective July 1.

27-60-106.5. Criminal justice diversion programs - report - rules.

The BHA may contract with cities and counties for the creation, maintenance, or expansion of criminal justice diversion programs. The goal of each program created pursuant to this section should be to connect first responders with behavioral health providers to assist individuals in need of behavioral health intervention or to divert individuals from the criminal justice system.

The BHA may require criminal justice diversion programs contracted pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section to participate as a mobile crisis service in the behavioral health crisis response system, created pursuant to section 27-60-103.

On or before November 1, 2021, and on or before each November 1 thereafter, the BHA shall include an update regarding the current status of funding and the criminal justice diversion programs implemented pursuant to this section in its report to the judiciary committees of the senate and the house of representatives, the health and human services committee of the senate, the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" presentation required by section 2-7-203.

The state board of human services, created in section 26-1-107, may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1426, § 10, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1524, § 93, effective July 1.

27-60-107. Behavioral health entity licenses - assistance - transfer of staff. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1237), ch. 413, p. 3637, § 2, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1524, § 94, effective July 1.

27-60-108. Peer support professionals - cash fund - fees - requirements - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Peer support professionals help people achieve their recovery goals through shared understanding, respect, and empowerment. Peer support offers a form of acceptance, understanding, and validation not often found in other professional relationships.

The federal centers for medicare and medicaid services recognize that peer support professionals can be an important component in a state's delivery of effective mental health and substance use disorder treatment;

Peer support services can cut hospitalizations, increase a person's engagement in self-care and wellness, and help to decrease a person's psychotic symptoms;

The COVID-19 pandemic has exacerbated Colorado's existing behavioral health workforce shortage, particularly in rural areas and communities of color;

Colorado lacks a behavioral health workforce that reflects the culture, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, mental health service experiences, and substance use disorder experiences of individuals in the state;

In the past two years, the number of people who have needed but have not received behavioral health services has nearly doubled. Challenges to the workforce is considered the leading cause for the decreased availability of behavioral health services. Peer support professionals can help fill Colorado's workforce need.

The substance abuse and mental health services administration has identified peer-run organizations as an evidence-based practice. Peer-run organizations may offer a variety of services, including but not limited to:

Peer-run drop-in centers;

Recovery and wellness centers;

Employment services;

Prevention and early intervention activities;

Peer mentoring for children and adolescents;

Warm lines; or

Advocacy services.

Peer-run organizations, including recovery community organizations, are important components in Colorado's behavioral health system. These organizations help individuals define their life goals and find a unique path toward recovery in a holistic manner.

The general assembly finds, therefore, that it is in the best interest of the state to support the peer support professional workforce through the creation of peer-run recovery support services organizations. Peer-run and peer-led organizations will help expand peer support services throughout the state, expand the behavioral health workforce, and save the state money by reducing the need for crisis services.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Licensed mental health provider" means a:

Mental health professional licensed or certified pursuant to article 245 of title 12, except for unlicensed psychotherapists pursuant to article 245 of title 12;

Advanced practice registered nurse registered pursuant to section 12-255-111 with training in substance use disorders or mental health;

Physician assistant licensed pursuant to section 12-240-113 with specific training in substance use disorders or mental health;

Psychiatric technician licensed pursuant to article 295 of title 12; and

Medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12.

"Peer support professional" means a peer support specialist, recovery coach, peer and family recovery support specialist, peer mentor, family advocate, or family systems navigator who meets the qualifications described in subsection (3)(a)(III) of this section.

"Recovery support services organization" means an independent entity led and governed by representatives of local communities of recovery and approved by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section.

On or before July 1, 2022, the BHA shall develop a procedure for recovery support services organizations to be approved by the commissioner for reimbursement pursuant to this section. The procedures must ensure that the recovery support services organization:

Provides recovery-focused services and supports;

Employs or contracts with a licensed mental health provider to administer on-going supervision of peer support professionals employed by recovery support services organizations. The licensed mental health provider must be in good standing and must demonstrate having received formal training specific to the provision of peer support services and supervision of peer support professionals;

Employs or contracts with peer support professionals who must:

Self-identify as having experienced the process of recovery from a mental health disorder, substance use disorder, trauma, or one or all of such conditions, either as a consumer of recovery services or as the parent or a family member of the consumer;

Have successfully completed formal training covering all content areas outlined in the core competencies for peer support professionals established by either the BHA or the substance abuse and mental health services administration of the United States department of health and human services; and

Provide nonclinical support services that align with recommendations from the substance abuse and mental health services administration of the United States department of health and human services, including engaging individuals in peer-to-peer relationships that support healing, personal growth, life skills development, self-care, and crisis-strategy development to help achieve recovery, wellness, and life goals;

Has an established process by which the organization coordinates its services with those rendered by other agencies to ensure an uninterrupted continuum of care to persons with behavioral health disorders; and

Meets any other standards as determined by rule of the executive director.

A peer support professional may provide services for a recovery support services organization in various clinical and nonclinical settings, including but not limited to:

Justice-involved settings;

Physical health settings, such as pediatrician or obstetric and gynecological health-care offices;

Emergency departments;

Services delivered via telehealth;

Agencies serving homeless communities;

Peer respite homes;

School-based health centers; and

Home- and community-based settings.

The commissioner, in collaboration with the department of health care policy and financing, may promulgate rules establishing minimum standards that recovery support services organizations must meet.

The BHA may charge a fee for recovery support services organizations seeking approval pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section. If the commissioner charges a fee to recovery support services organizations, the commissioner shall promulgate rules to establish the fee in an amount not to substantially exceed the amount charged to other behavioral health providers seeking approval from the BHA. The BHA shall deposit any fees collected into the peer support professional workforce cash fund created in subsection (6) of this section.

The BHA may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section. The BHA shall transfer each gift, grant, and donation to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the peer support professional workforce cash fund created in subsection (6) of this section.

There is created in the state treasury the peer support professional workforce cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which consists of:

Fees collected pursuant to subsection (4) of this section;

Gifts, grants, and donations collected pursuant to subsection (5) of this section; and

Money appropriated to the fund by the general assembly.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Any unexpended and unencumbered money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year remains in the fund and is not transferred to the general fund or any other fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the BHA may expend state money from the fund for the purpose of implementing this section.

A peer-run recovery service provider shall not be compelled to seek approval from the BHA to become a recovery support services organization. Expanded service funding available for recovery services through recovery support services organizations is intended to supplement existing state investment in the recovery system infrastructure. The BHA shall fund recovery services, within existing appropriations, including peer-run organizations that do not seek to be recovery support services organizations.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1021), ch. 256, p. 1505, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2)(c), IP(3)(a), (3)(a)(III)(B), (3)(c), (4), (5), (6)(d), and (7) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1524, § 95, effective July 1.

27-60-109. Temporary youth mental health services program - established - report - rules - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Portal" means the website or web-based application described in subsection (4) of this section that facilitates the program.

"Program" means the temporary youth mental health services program established in this section.

"Provider" means a licensed psychiatrist regulated pursuant to article 240 of title 12 or any of the following licensees, certified professionals, or candidates regulated pursuant to article 245 of title 12: A licensed psychologist or psychologist candidate; licensed social worker, licensed clinical social worker, or clinical social worker candidate; licensed marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist candidate; licensed professional counselor or licensed professional counselor candidate; or licensed addiction counselor, certified addiction specialist, or addiction counselor candidate.

"Telehealth" has the same meaning set forth in section 10-16-123.

"Youth" means:

A person eighteen years of age or younger; and

A person who is twenty-one years of age or younger but older than eighteen years of age who is receiving special education services pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 22.

There is established in the behavioral health administration the temporary youth mental health services program to facilitate access to mental health services, including substance use disorder services, for youth to respond to mental health needs identified in an initial mental health screening through the portal, including those needs that may have resulted from the COVID-19 pandemic. The program reimburses providers for up to three mental health sessions with a youth.

The BHA shall reimburse providers who participate in the program for each mental health session with a youth, either in-person or by telehealth, up to a maximum of three sessions per youth client; except that subject to available money, the BHA may reimburse a provider for additional sessions. To be eligible for reimbursement from the program, a provider must be available to provide three mental health sessions to each youth the provider accepts as a client.

A provider shall maintain client confidentiality pursuant to state or federal law with regard to a youth client who participates in a mental health session with the provider that is reimbursed pursuant to the program.

The BHA shall:

Develop a process consistent with the requirements of this section for providers to apply for, and demonstrate eligibility to receive, reimbursement from the program;

Determine a reasonable rate of reimbursement for each mental health session with a youth client pursuant to the program, which rate must be the same regardless of whether the appointment is a telehealth or in-person appointment; and

Implement a statewide public awareness and outreach campaign about the program. The general assembly encourages the BHA to involve schools, neighborhood youth organizations, health-care providers, faith-based organizations, and any other community-based organizations that interact with youth on the local level in disseminating information about the program.

The state board may promulgate rules necessary for the administration of this section, including rules to protect the privacy of youth who receive services through the program.

The BHA shall enter into an agreement with a vendor to create, or use an existing, website or web-based application as a portal available to youth and providers to facilitate the program. The portal must:

Serve as a platform for initial age-appropriate mental health screenings to determine if a youth may benefit from mental health support;

Allow providers to register and share in-person or telehealth appointment availability;

When possible, connect youth with providers who accept the youth's insurance or payment source that may cover the costs of ongoing mental health treatment, if the youth has insurance or a payment source; and

Allow a youth, regardless of whether the youth has insurance or any other payment source, to schedule telehealth appointments with a provider. An in-person appointment may be provided if and when available.

The selection of a vendor pursuant to this subsection (4) is exempt from the requirements of the procurement code, articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

On or before January 1 of each year, and on or before June 30 of each year, the state department shall report to the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, regarding the number of youth who received services under the program, excluding any personally identifiable information in accordance with state and federal law; information in aggregate about the services provided to youth under the program; and other relevant information regarding the program.

(5.5) (a) For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate six million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the state department for the purposes of this section. Any unexpended or unencumbered money appropriated pursuant to this section remains available for expenditure for the same purpose in the 2023-24 state fiscal year without further appropriation.

The state department and office shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (5.5) is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1258), ch. 265, p. 1542, § 2, effective June 18.

L. 2022:

(5) and (6) amended and (5.5) added, (HB 22-1243), ch. 189, p. 1263, § 3, effective May 19; (2)(a), (2)(b), IP(3)(a), (3)(a)(III), (3)(b), and IP(4)(a), (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1525, § 96, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1258, see section 1 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2021. For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1243, see section 1 of chapter 189, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-60-110. Behavioral health-care services for rural and agricultural communities - vouchers - contract - appropriation.

No later than one hundred eighty days after June 28, 2021, the BHA, in collaboration with the department of agriculture, shall contract with a nonprofit organization primarily focused on serving agricultural and rural communities in Colorado, as identified by the BHA, to provide vouchers to individuals living in rural and frontier communities in need of behavioral health-care services.

The nonprofit organization awarded the contract pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall:

Contract with licensed behavioral health-care providers that have completed training on cultural competencies specific to the Colorado agricultural and rural community lifestyle to provide direct behavioral health-care services to farmers, ranchers, farm and ranch workers and their families, and other underserved populations in rural and agricultural communities. At least sixty percent of the money received pursuant to the contract must be used for direct behavioral health-care services described in this subsection (2)(a).

Develop training materials and train behavioral health-care providers on cultural competencies specific to the Colorado agricultural and rural community lifestyle.

For the 2021-22 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall annually appropriate fifty thousand dollars for the contract awarded pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2367, § 14, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1526, § 97, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-60-111. County-based behavioral health grant program - created - report - rules - repeal.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the county-based behavioral health grant program, referred to in this section as the "grant program", to provide matching grants to county departments of human or social services for the expansion or improvement of local or regional behavioral health disorder treatment programs.

Grant recipients may use the money received through the grant program for the following purposes:

Peer training;

Augmentation of direct therapy;

Acute treatment units;

Inpatient treatment programs;

Outreach and education;

Navigation or care coordination;

Capital investments in behavioral health center infrastructure;

Services for non-English-speaking individuals;

Culturally responsive and attuned services;

Suicide prevention and intervention;

Crisis response;

Withdrawal management;

Workforce development;

Supporting regional service delivery; or

Any other purpose the BHA identifies that will expand or improve local or regional behavioral health disorder treatment programs.

The BHA shall administer the grant program and shall award grants as provided in this section.

The BHA shall implement the grant program in accordance with this section. At a minimum, the BHA shall specify the time frames for applying for grants, the form of the grant program application, and the time frames for distributing grant money.

Each grant applicant shall demonstrate:

A dedication of local funding to support the expansion or improvement of local behavioral health disorder treatment programs, which may be from the county's local share of the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021", Pub.L. 117-2, as the act may be subsequently amended, or other local revenue sources; or

A plan for regional collaboration between no fewer than three counties to support the expansion or improvement of regional behavioral health disorder treatment programs.

No single grant awarded may exceed one million dollars, unless a grant is awarded for a regional effort involving two or more counties.

A direct service provider that receives a grant shall limit any indirect expenses to no more than ten percent of the total state money awarded, and any entity that receives a grant and oversees a direct service provider shall limit the entity's indirect expenses to no more than five percent of the total state money awarded.

If any grant money is used for capital projects, the grant recipient shall demonstrate a commitment to continue those services past the grant cycle for at least an additional five years.

A grant applicant shall disclose if any project or program is receiving money from another payer source, including but not limited to private dollars, county dollars, state block grants, or money awarded by a managed service organization.

To receive a grant, a county department of human or social services shall submit an application to the BHA. The BHA shall give priority to applications that demonstrate innovation and collaboration or include rural or frontier communities; address a demonstrated need, as identified by community input and local planning efforts; and demonstrate the ability to rapidly distribute the grant money into the community. The BHA shall award grant money equitably to reflect the geographic diversity of the state.

Subject to available appropriations, beginning January 1, 2022, and on or before January 1 each year thereafter for the duration of the grant program, the BHA shall award grants as provided in this section. The BHA shall distribute the grant money within ninety days after the BHA awards the grants.

On or before February 1, 2023, and on or before February 1 each year thereafter for the duration of the grant program, each county department of human or social services that receives a grant through the grant program shall submit a report to the BHA on the use of the grant money received pursuant to this section, including the total number of individuals served, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and age.

On or before April 1, 2023, and on or before April 1 each year thereafter for the duration of the grant program, the BHA shall submit a summarized report of the information received pursuant to subsection (8)(a) of this section to the joint budget committee, the health and insurance committee and the public and behavioral health and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees, on the grant program.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate nine million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the state department for use by the BHA for the purposes of this section. If any unexpended or unencumbered money remains at the end of the fiscal year, the BHA may expend the money for the same purposes in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2368, § 15, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1), (2)(o), (3), (4), (6), (7), (8), and (9) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1526, § 98, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 38 of chapter 362 (SB 21-137), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that section 15 of the act adding this section takes effect only if SB 21-288 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of SB 21-137 or one day after the passage of SB 21-288, whichever is later. SB 21-288 became law and took effect June 11, 2021, and SB 21-137 took effect June 28, 2021.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

27-60-112. Behavioral health-care workforce development program - creation - rules - report.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the behavioral health-care workforce development program, referred to in this section as the "program". The purpose of the program is to increase the behavioral health-care workforce's ability to treat individuals, including youth, with severe behavioral health disorders.

To implement the program, the BHA shall:

Develop an online training system that allows for accessible statewide training opportunities;

Develop an online training curriculum for providers in rural and metro areas to increase competencies in mental health and substance use disorders that will support a high-quality, trained, culturally responsive, and diverse behavioral health-care workforce.

The office shall also:

Develop a process to track, store, and create reports concerning the training and continuing education in the curriculum developed pursuant to subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section and to track providers' completion of in-person and virtual training offered pursuant to this subsection (2)(b); and

Collaborate with credentialing entities to track peer support professionals in the state.

Provide fiscal incentives for lower income individuals to obtain a degree in behavioral health, with funding specifically targeted for rural areas of the state;

Provide training to the existing behavioral health-care workforce to be certified in federally reimbursed services; and

Provide capacity-building grants to diversify the safety net provider workforce and meet the requirements of part 3 of article 50 of this title 27.

The state board may promulgate rules as necessary for the implementation of this section.

For the state fiscal year 2021-22 and each state fiscal year thereafter for which the program receives funding, the BHA shall report a summary of the expenditures from the program, the impact of the expenditures in increasing the behavioral health-care workforce, and any recommendations to strengthen and improve the behavioral health-care workforce as part of its annual presentation to the general assembly required under the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act", part 2 of article 7 of title 2.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2370, § 16, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(1), IP(2), (2)(e), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1528, § 99, effective July 1; (2)(b) amended, (SB 22-181), ch. 452, p. 3252, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Section 38 of chapter 362 (SB 21-137), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that section 16 of the act adding this section takes effect only if SB 21-288 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of SB 21-137 or one day after the passage of SB 21-288, whichever is later. SB 21-288 became law and took effect June 11, 2021, and SB 21-137 took effect June 28, 2021.

Cross references:

(1) For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 22-181, see section 1 of chapter 452, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-60-113. Out-of-home placement for children and youth with mental or behavioral needs - rules - report - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2371, § 17, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

Entire section repealed, (HB 22-1283), ch. 185, p. 1244, § 4, effective May 18; (2) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 863, § 115, effective July 1.

27-60-114. Colorado land-based tribe behavioral health services grant - creation - funding - definitions - repeal.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Colorado land-based tribe" means the southern Ute Indian tribe and the Ute mountain Ute tribe.

"Grant applicant" means the southern Ute Indian tribe, the Ute mountain Ute tribe, or any authorized department, division, or affiliate thereof that applies for the grant pursuant to this section.

"Grant program" means the Colorado land-based tribe behavioral health services grant program created in subsection (2) of this section.

"Grant recipient" means the southern Ute Indian tribe, the Ute mountain Ute tribe, or any authorized department, division, or affiliate thereof that is awarded the grant pursuant to this section.

There is created in the state department the Colorado land-based tribe behavioral health services grant program to provide funding to one or more Colorado land-based tribes to support capital expenditure for the renovation or building of a behavioral health facility to provide behavioral and mental health services as the grant recipient may deem appropriate, which services may include inpatient services and transitional housing to principally or fully serve American Indian and Alaska native individuals, including those who may be eligible for Indian health service benefits.

The grant recipient may use the money received through the grant program for capital expenditure costs associated with renovating an existing behavioral health facility or building a new behavioral health facility to provide behavioral health services as the grant recipient may deem appropriate, which may include inpatient behavioral health services and transitional housing, to principally serve the American Indian and Alaska native patients including those who may be eligible for Indian health service benefits. Subject to available appropriations, the state department shall implement and administer the grant program and shall award the grant to the grant recipient in an amount not greater than five million dollars.

An eligible Colorado land-based tribe may apply to the state department in accordance with the procedures, time frames, and requirements set by the state department to receive money through the grant program.

The state department shall review applications received from grant applicants pursuant to this section.

To receive a grant, a grant applicant must submit an application to the state department in the form prescribed by the state department.

The state department may select a grant recipient to receive the grant under this grant program in an amount not greater than five million dollars.

To be eligible to receive a grant, a grant applicant must submit to the state department a written justification as set forth in 31 CFR 35.6 (b)(4) for the capital expenditure; except that this requirement does not apply if the state department determines that the written justification is not required based on how the expenditures authorized pursuant to this section will be reported to the United States department of the treasury.

The state department and the grant recipient shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

For state fiscal year 2022-23, the general assembly shall appropriate five million dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the state department to be used for the purposes of this section.

The state department shall distribute the grant money to the grant recipient within thirty days after the grant recipient submits a written justification specified in subsection (8) of this section but not later than December 31, 2024. The grant recipient shall spend or obligate all grant money awarded to the grant recipient by December 31, 2024. Any money obligated by December 31, 2024, must be expended by December 31, 2026.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-148), ch. 217, p. 1428, § 2, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-148, see section 1 of chapter 217, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.